North Carolina, session 2025, HB712.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 10 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 143B-431.4. Universal Income Program established.
(a) The NC Universal Income Program (NCUIP) is established in the Department of
Commerce. The NCUIP shall incentivize individuals having difficulty finding good permanent
employment to volunteer in the community and to receive retraining. The Pay-It-Forward Fund
(Fund) is established in the Department of Commerce to support the NCUIP. The Department's
development of program activities and funding options shall focus on public-private partnerships,
tax incentives, and other methods appropriate to obtain the resources required to fund the NCUIP
and to provide valuable volunteer opportunities for the community and employment retraining
to participants. The Department of Commerce shall seek funding for the Fund from private
sources and from the local, State, and federal levels of government. The Department of
Commerce shall adopt rules to implement this section.
(b) In consultation with the North Carolina Department of Revenue, the Department of
Commerce shall implement a repayment program for NCUIP graduates to pay an extra one
percent (1%) in State individual income taxes, with that revenue going into the Pay-It-Forward
Fund to provide the universal income to others in the program.
(c) By January 1, 2026, the Department of Commerce shall establish and administer the
NCUIP to provide a monthly income of up to three thousand dollars ($3,000) per month, for up
to five years, to eligible individuals who are receiving job training, performing volunteer work,
or both, in accordance with the requirements of the program.
(d) By April 1, 2026, and then annually thereafter, the Secretary of the Department of
Commerce shall report to the General Assembly on the implementation of this section."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H712-v-1*